District of Columbia statutes.
6-331.03

District of Columbia Relocation Assistance Office.

There is hereby established within the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency an office to be known as the District of Columbia Relocation Assistance Office (hereinafter referred to as the “Office”). The Office shall provide the relocation services authorized by § 6-331.01, administer the payments authorized by former § 5-729 [Code, 1973 Ed.] and provide the relocation assistance which the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency is authorized to provide by §§ 6-301.01 to 6-301.20 [repealed] and any other act.

Oct. 6, 1964, 78 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 88-629, § 4
1981 Ed., § 5-832.
1973 Ed., § 5-731.
“Former § 5-729”, referred to in the second sentence, is § 5-729, D.C. Code, 1973 Ed.